Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
461

PHARMACISTS
AND PHARMACY

Section

461-1 Definitions

461-2 Board of pharmacy; appointment;
qualifications

461-3 Records

461-4 Repealed

461-4.5 Powers and duties

461-5 Qualifications for license

461-6 Examination; license

461-7 Temporary license

461-8 Renewal of licenses; continuing education

requirement

461-8.5 Reciprocity

461-8.6 Wholesale prescription drug distributor
license

461-9 Pharmacist in charge; pharmacy personnel

461-10 Pharmacies

461-10.5 Repealed

461-11 Duties of registered pharmacist

461-11.4 Vaccinations; children

461-11.5 Repealed

461-12 Adequate equipment

461-13 Prescription record

461-14 Permits for operation of pharmacy

461-15 Miscellaneous permits

461-16 Fees for permits and licenses; renewal

461-16.5 Repealed

461-17 Penalties

461-18 Right of injunction

461-19 Application of law

461-20 Poison law not amended

461-21 Disciplinary action

461-21.5 Discipline based on action taken by another state

or federal agency; conditions; prohibition on
practice

461-22 Cumulative remedies

Note

Prescription drug benefits, mail order opt out option;
reports to legislature (2014-2015); applicability. L 2013, c 226, §§4, 5, 8.

Cross References

Board of pharmacy licensure or regulatory requirements not
applicable to medical use of marijuana, see §329-131.

Expedited partner therapy, see chapter 453, pt III.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Prescription drug benefits, see chapter 431R.

Prescription drugs; mail order opt out option, see §87A-16.3.

Sale of sterile syringes for prevention of diseases, see
§325-21.

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Compelled Expression of the Religiously Forbidden:
Pharmacists, "Duty to Fill" Statutes, and the Hybrid Rights
Exception. 29 UH L. Rev. 97 (2006).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next